Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 1

General Emergency Provisions

58-2-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” means the Tennessee emergency management agency (TEMA);

“Broadcaster” means a radio broadcasting station or a television broadcasting station primarily engaged in the business of facilitating or originating speech, pictures or both through over the air communications, both as to pure speech and commercial speech and for all purposes operating under licenses provided by the federal communications commission and which station has been selected by the federal emergency management agency as a primary entry point;

“CLEO” means the chief local elected official;

“Compacts” means the emergency management compacts included in parts 4 and 7 of this chapter;

“Disaster” means any natural, technological, or civil emergency that causes damage of sufficient severity and magnitude to result in a declaration of a state emergency by a county, the governor, or the president of the United States. “Disaster” is identifiable by the severity of resulting damage, as follows:

“Catastrophic disaster” means a disaster that will require massive state and federal assistance, including immediate military involvement;

“Major disaster” means a disaster that will likely exceed local capabilities and require a broad range of state and federal assistance; and

“Minor disaster” means a disaster that is likely to be within the response capabilities of local government and to result in only a minimal need for state or federal assistance;

“EMA” means a local emergency management agency of a political subdivision;

“Emergency” means an occurrence, or threat thereof, whether natural, technological, or manmade, in war or in peace, that results or may result in substantial injury or harm to the population, or substantial damage to or loss of property; provided, that natural threats may include disease outbreaks and epidemics;

“Emergency management” means the preparation for, the mitigation of, the response to, and the recovery from emergencies and disasters. Specific emergency management responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

Reduction of vulnerability of people and communities of this state to damage, injury, and loss of life and property resulting from natural, technological, or manmade emergencies or hostile military or paramilitary action;

Preparation for prompt and efficient response and recovery to protect lives and property affected by emergencies;

Response to emergencies using all systems, plans, and resources necessary to preserve adequately the health, safety, and welfare of persons or property affected by the emergency;

Recovery from emergencies by providing for the rapid and orderly start of restoration and rehabilitation of persons and property affected by emergencies;

Provision of an emergency management system embodying all aspects of pre-emergency preparedness and post emergency response, recovery, and mitigation; and

Assistance in anticipation, recognition, appraisal, prevention, and mitigation of emergencies which may be caused or aggravated by inadequate planning for, and regulation of, public and private facilities and land use;

“Emergency management preparedness and assistance trust fund” means a trust fund to be administered solely by TEMA. All funds collected by the state and placed in this trust fund shall be designated for emergency management purposes only;

“Emergency response broadcaster” means a person certified pursuant to § 58-2-128 as an emergency response broadcaster;

“Emergency services coordinator” or “ESC” means the person or persons selected by the head of each executive branch agency or commissioner designated by the governor and includes alternates. The ESC and an alternate will be responsible for coordinating with the agency on emergency preparedness issues, preparing and maintaining emergency preparedness and post disaster response and recovery plans for their agency, maintaining rosters of personnel to assist in disaster operations, and coordinating appropriate training for agency personnel;

“Energy emergency” means a condition of danger to the health, safety, welfare, or economic well being of the citizens of this state arising out of a present or threatened shortage of usable energy resources; also any condition of substantial danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the citizens of this state resulting from the operation of any electrical power generating facility, the transport of any energy resource by any means whatsoever, or the production, use or disposal of any source material, special nuclear material, or by-product material as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 68 Stat. 919 (42 U.S.C. §§ 2011-2394); also any nuclear incident, as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, occurring in or outside this state, substantially affecting the health, safety, or welfare of the citizens of this state;

“Energy resources” includes all forms of energy or power, including without limitation, oil, gasoline, and other petroleum products; natural or synthetic gas; electricity in all forms and from all sources; and other fuels of any description;

“Entity” includes a firm, business, for profit and not-for-profit corporation, profit and not-for-profit unincorporated association, partnership, and two (2) or more persons having a joint or common economic interest;

“GAR” means the governor's authorized representative;

“Local emergency management agency” means an organization created in accordance with this chapter to discharge the emergency management responsibilities and functions of a political subdivision;

“Manmade emergency” means an emergency caused by an action against persons or society, including, but not limited to, enemy attack, sabotage, terrorism, civil unrest, or other action impairing the orderly administration of government;

“Mobile reserve unit” means an organization for emergency management created in accordance with this chapter by state or local authority to be dispatched by the governor to supplement local organizations for emergency management in a stricken area;

“Natural emergency” means any emergency caused by a natural event, including, but not limited to, a storm, a flood, a drought, or an earthquake;

“Person” includes a natural person or entity organized under the laws of this state or any other state or territory of the United States or the federal government, as the case may be, and includes both the singular and plural;

“Political subdivision” means any municipality or county, including any county having metropolitan form of government, created pursuant to law;

“Public official” means an elected or appointed person in the executive, legislative or judicial branch of the state or any political subdivision of the state;

“SCO” means state coordinating officer;

“Technological emergency” means an emergency caused by a technological failure or accident, including, but not limited to, an explosion, transportation accident, radiological accident, or chemical or other hazardous material incident; and

“TEMP” means Tennessee emergency management plan.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1; 2006, ch. 588, § 1; 2009, ch. 288, § 2; 2014, ch. 730, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For establishment of Tennessee emergency management agency as the agency of state government having responsibility and authority for planning disaster and emergency preparedness and directing response, see Executive Order Nos. 4 (February 13, 1987) and 15 (April 17, 1998).

Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

For the Preamble to the act concerning emergency preparedness, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 730.

Acts 2014, ch. 730 § 1 provided that the act, which added the definitions of “broadcaster” and “emergency response broadcaster”, shall be known and may be cited as the “Emergency Response Broadcasters Act.”

Cross-References. Civil defense functions include natural and nonhostile disasters, § 58-2-102.

Coordination with state military affairs, § 58-1-116.

Emergency communications districts, title 7, ch. 86.

Terrorism Prevention and Response Act of 2002, title 39, ch. 13, part 8.

Procedures when emergency necessitates change to polling place location within 10 days of election day, § 2-3-110.

Attorney General Opinions. Use of blue flashing lights by county emergency management agency officers, OAG 99-062 (3/12/99).

Vehicles of an emergency management agency of a Tennessee city or county may be equipped with blue flashing lights, OAG 06-050 (3/16/06).

58-2-102. Legislative intent.

The general assembly finds and declares that the state is vulnerable to a wide range of emergencies, including natural, technological, terrorist acts, and manmade disasters, all of which threaten the life, health, and safety of its people; damage and destroy property; disrupt services and everyday business and recreational activities; and impede economic growth and development. The general assembly further finds that this vulnerability is exacerbated by the growth in the state's population, in the elderly population, in the number of seasonal vacationers, and in the number of persons with special needs. This growth has greatly complicated the state's ability to coordinate its emergency management resources and activities.

It is the intent of the general assembly to reduce the vulnerability of the people and property of this state; to prepare for efficient evacuation or shelter-in-place of threatened or affected persons; to provide for the rapid and orderly provision of relief to persons and for the restoration of services and property; and to provide for the coordination of activities relating to emergency preparedness, response, recovery, and mitigation among and between agencies and officials of this state, with similar agencies and officials of other states, with local and federal governments, with interstate organizations, and with the private sector.

It is further the intent of the general assembly to promote the state's emergency preparedness, response, recovery, and mitigation capabilities through enhanced coordination, long-term planning, and adequate funding. State policy for responding to disasters is to support local emergency response efforts. In the case of a major or catastrophic disaster, however, the needs of residents and communities will likely be greater than local resources. In these situations, the state must be capable of providing effective, coordinated, and timely support to communities and the public. Therefore, the general assembly hereby determines and declares that this chapter fulfills a compelling state interest.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1; 2002, ch. 849, § 7a.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

58-2-103. Policy and purpose.

Because of the existing and continuing possibility of the occurrence of emergencies and disasters resulting from natural, technological, or manmade causes, including acts of terrorism and the recovery therefrom; in order to ensure that preparations of this state will be adequate to deal with, reduce vulnerability to, and recover from such emergencies and disasters; to provide for the common defense and to protect the public peace, health, and safety; and to preserve the lives and property of the people of the state, it is hereby found and declared to be necessary to:

Create a state emergency management agency to be known as the “Tennessee emergency management agency” (TEMA), to authorize the creation of local organizations for emergency management in the political subdivisions of the state, and to authorize cooperation with the federal government and the governments of other states;

Confer upon the governor, TEMA, and the governing body of each political subdivision of the state the emergency powers provided herein;

Provide for the rendering of mutual aid among the political subdivisions of the state, with other states, and with the federal government with respect to carrying out all emergency management functions and responsibilities;

Authorize the establishment of such organizations and the development and employment of such measures as are necessary and appropriate to carry out this chapter; and

Provide the means to assist in the prevention or mitigation of emergencies which may be caused or aggravated by inadequate planning for, and regulation of, public and private facilities and land use, not to exclude flood plain management.

It is further declared to be the purpose of this chapter and the policy of the state that all emergency management functions of the state be coordinated to the maximum extent with comparable functions of the federal government, including its various departments, agencies of other states and localities, and private agencies of every type, to the end that the most effective preparation and use may be made of the manpower, resources, and facilities of the nation for dealing with any emergency that may occur.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For establishment of Tennessee emergency response council, see Executive Orders No. 7 (April 1, 1987).

For establishment of Tennessee emergency management agency as the agency of state government having responsibility and authority for planning disaster and emergency preparedness and directing response, see Executive Order Nos. 4 (February 13, 1987) and 15 (April 17, 1998).

The Tennessee emergency management agency, created by this section and § 58-2-104, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246.

Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Cross-References. Emergency management agency as part of military department, § 58-1-114.

58-2-104. Creation of agency — Director and deputies.

The governor is hereby authorized and directed to create a state agency to be known as the “Tennessee emergency management agency” (TEMA) under the adjutant general for day-to-day administrative purposes and, upon the recommendation of the adjutant general, to appoint a director of TEMA, who shall be the administrator thereof. The director shall hold office at the pleasure of the governor, and shall receive such salary as is fixed by the adjutant general and approved by the governor. The agency shall authorize the creation of local organizations for emergency management in the political subdivisions of the state, and authorize cooperation with the federal government and the governments of other states.

The governor is hereby authorized to appoint such deputy directors of the agency as the governor may in the exercise of the governor's sound discretion deem necessary, and such directors, in the discretion of the governor and upon the recommendation of the adjutant general, may be state employees who shall serve in such capacity without additional compensation.

The director, subject to the direction and control of the governor, acting through the adjutant general, shall be the executive head of the agency and shall be responsible to the governor for carrying out the program for TEMA for this state. The director shall coordinate the activities of all organizations for the agency within the state and shall maintain liaison with and cooperate with emergency management agencies and organizations of other states and of the federal government. For normal day-to-day administrative functions, the director shall report to the adjutant general. During emergency conditions, the agency and director shall report to the governor or the governor's designee. General coordination with the adjutant general shall be maintained. The department of the military shall become a resource for the state as with all other departments and agencies; further, the director shall make recommendations to the governor for the use of the national guard and other state resources as disaster conditions mandate, including, but not limited to, the assistance of local and private agencies. The director shall coordinate with the governor's office on the activation or the potential activation of any mutual aid agreement or compact.

The adjutant general, upon the recommendation of the director, may employ such area directors, professional, technical, clerical, stenographic, and other personnel, and the adjutant general shall fix their compensation and may make expenditures from available funds appropriated for the military department or from funds made available to the adjutant general for purposes of emergency management, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The director shall be provided with necessary, and appropriate office space, furniture, supplies, stationery, printing and equipment, including but not limited to, radio, radiological and any and all other proper equipment necessary to carry out the emergency management program for the state. The necessary mileage, office expenses, salaries of personnel, postage, telephone and expressage shall be chargeable to any funds available for emergency management.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

The Tennessee emergency management agency, created by this section and § 58-2-103, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246.

58-2-105. Limitations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:

Interfere with the course or conduct of a labor dispute, except that actions otherwise authorized by this chapter or other laws may be taken when necessary to forestall or mitigate imminent or existing danger to public health or safety;

Interfere with dissemination of news or comment on public affairs; but any communications facility or organization, including, but not limited to, radio and television stations, wire services, and newspapers, may be required to transmit or print public service messages furnishing information or instructions in connection with an emergency;

Affect the jurisdiction or responsibilities of police forces, firefighting forces, units of the armed forces of the United States, or any personnel thereof, when on active duty; state, local, and interjurisdictional emergency plans shall place reliance upon the forces available for performance of functions related to emergencies; and

Limit, modify, or abridge the authority of the governor to proclaim martial rule or exercise any other powers vested in the governor under the constitution, statutes or common law of this state independent of or in conjunction with this chapter; provided, that the authority shall be limited to the extent provided under § 58-2-107(m) and as otherwise specifically provided by statute.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1; 2009, ch. 288, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

58-2-106. Emergency management responsibilities and powers.

The agency is responsible for maintaining a comprehensive statewide program of emergency management. The agency is responsible for coordination with efforts of the federal government with other departments and agencies of state government, county governments, municipal governments and school boards, and private agencies that have a role in emergency management. The director of the agency shall be the state coordinating officer (SCO) and the governor's authorized representative (GAR).

The agency is responsible for carrying out this chapter. In performing its duties under this chapter, the agency shall:

Prepare a TEMP and maintain an accountable ESC program, which shall be integrated into and coordinated with the emergency management plans and programs of the federal government. The plan shall be implemented by a continuous, integrated comprehensive emergency management program. The plan must contain provisions to ensure that the state is prepared for emergencies and minor, major, and catastrophic disasters, and the agency shall work closely with local governments and agencies and organizations with emergency management responsibilities in preparing and maintaining the plan. The TEMP shall be planning, response, recovery and mitigation oriented and shall include the following:

An evacuation component that includes specific regional and interregional planning provisions and promotes intergovernmental coordination of evacuation activities;

A shelter component that includes specific regional and interregional planning provisions and promotes coordination of shelter activities between the public, private, and nonprofit sectors;

A postdisaster response and recovery component that includes specific regional and interregional planning provisions and promotes intergovernmental coordination of postdisaster response and recovery activities. This component must provide for postdisaster response and recovery strategies according to whether a disaster is minor, major, or catastrophic. The postdisaster response and recovery component must, at a minimum:

Establish the structure of the state's postdisaster response and recovery organization;

Establish procedures for activating the state's plan;

Set forth policies used to guide postdisaster response and recovery activities;

Describe the chain of command during the postdisaster response and recovery period;

Describe initial and continuous postdisaster response and recovery actions;

Identify the roles and responsibilities of each involved agency and organization;

Provide for a comprehensive communications plan, including, but not limited to, a computerized telephone emergency warning system;

Establish procedures for monitoring mutual aid agreements;

Provide for assessment teams;

Ensure the availability of an effective statewide urban search and rescue program coordinated with the fire services;

Ensure the existence of a comprehensive statewide medical care plan; and

Establish systems for coordinating volunteers and accepting and distributing donated funds and goods;

Additional provisions addressing aspects of preparedness, response, recovery, and mitigation as determined necessary by the agency;

Address the need for coordinated and expeditious deployment of state resources, including the Tennessee national guard and requesting of federal assets;

Establish a system of communications and warning to ensure that the state's population and emergency management agencies are warned of developing emergency situations and can communicate emergency response decisions;

Establish guidelines and schedules for exercises that evaluate the ability of the state and its political subdivisions to respond to minor, major, and catastrophic disasters and support local emergency management agencies. Such exercises shall be coordinated with local governments and, to the extent possible, the federal government; and

Assign lead and support responsibilities to state agencies and personnel for emergency support functions and other support activities;

Adopt standards and requirements for county emergency management plans. The standards and requirements must ensure that county plans are coordinated and consistent with the TEMP. If a municipality elects to establish an emergency management program, it must adopt a city emergency management plan that complies with all standards and requirements applicable to county emergency management plans;

Assist political subdivisions in preparing and maintaining emergency management plans;

Periodically review political subdivision emergency management plans for consistency with the TEMP and standards and requirements adopted under this section;

Cooperate with the president of the United States, the heads of the armed forces, the various federal emergency management agencies, and the officers and agencies of other states in matters pertaining to emergency management in the state and the nation and incidents thereof and, in connection therewith, take any measures that it deems proper to carry into effect any request of the president and the appropriate federal officers and agencies for any emergency management action, including the direction or control of:

Emergency management drills, tests, or exercises of whatever nature; and

Warnings and signals for tests and drills, attacks, or other imminent emergencies or threats thereof and the mechanical devices to be used in connection with such warnings and signals;

Make recommendations to the general assembly for preparedness, prevention, and mitigation measures designed to eliminate emergencies or reduce their impact;

In accordance with the TEMP and program for emergency management, ascertain the requirements of the state and its political subdivisions for equipment and supplies of all kinds in the event of an emergency; plan for and either procure supplies, medicines, materials, and equipment or enter into memoranda of agreement or open purchase orders that will ensure their availability; and use and employ from time to time any of the property, services, and resources within the state in accordance with this chapter;

Anticipate trends and promote innovations that will enhance the emergency management system;

Institute statewide public awareness programs. This includes an intensive public educational campaign on emergency preparedness issues;

Prepare and distribute to appropriate state and local officials catalogs of federal, state, and private assistance programs;

Coordinate federal, state, and local emergency management activities and take all other steps, including the partial or full mobilization of emergency management forces and organizations in advance of an actual emergency, to ensure the availability of adequately trained and equipped forces of emergency management personnel before, during, and after emergencies and disasters;

Implement training programs to improve the ability of state and local emergency management personnel to prepare and implement emergency management plans and programs. This includes a continuous training program for agencies and individuals that will be called on to perform key roles in state and local postdisaster response and recovery efforts and for local government personnel on federal and state postdisaster response and recovery strategies and procedures;

Periodically review emergency operating procedures of state agencies and recommend revisions as needed to ensure consistency with the TEMP and program;

Make such surveys of industries, resources, and facilities within the state, both public and private, as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Prepare, in advance whenever possible, such executive orders, proclamations, and rules for issuance by the governor as are necessary or appropriate for coping with emergencies and disasters;

Cooperate with the federal government and any public or private agency or entity in achieving any purpose of this chapter and in implementing programs for mitigation, preparation, response, and recovery;

Delegate, as necessary and appropriate, authority vested in it under this chapter and provide for the subdelegation of such authority;

Create, implement, administer, promulgate, amend, and rescind rules, programs, and plans needed to carry out this chapter with due consideration for, and in cooperation with, the plans and programs of the federal government; and

Do other things necessary, incidental, or appropriate for the implementation of this chapter.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1; 2002, ch. 849, § 7b.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Cross-References. Office of energy programs, §§ 4-3-510 — 4-3-515.